Nevada, session 2025Special36, SB1.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 482.31565 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
482.31565 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a
short-term lessor shall not require the purchase of a waiver of
damages, optional insurance or any other optional good or service as
a condition for the lease of a passenger car.
2. A short-term lessor [shall] may require that a person seeking
to lease a passenger car provide proof of insurance that satisfies the
minimum amount of insurance coverage set forth in NRS 485.185 as
a condition for the lease of the passenger car. If a person seeking to
lease a passenger car cannot provide proof of such insurance, the
short-term lessor may:
(a) Sell the person a temporary policy of insurance that satisfies
the minimum amount of coverage set forth in NRS 485.185 or refer
the person to a third-party that sells a temporary policy of insurance
that satisfies such requirements. A temporary policy of insurance
offered or referred for sale by a short-term lessor must be offered at
a rate that does not exceed the standard market rate for similar
policies of insurance.
(b) If the person refuses to purchase a temporary policy of
insurance, refuse to lease the passenger car to the person.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a short-term
lessor may sell a waiver of damages but shall charge:
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 2 –
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), not more than
$22 per full or partial rental day or 24-hour rental period, as
appropriate, for the waiver. The amount of the charge set forth in
this paragraph must be adjusted for each fiscal year that begins on or
after July 1, 2008, by adding to that amount the product of that
amount multiplied by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price
Index West Urban for All Urban Consumers (All Items) between the
calendar year ending on December 31, 2005, and the calendar year
immediately preceding the fiscal year for which the adjustment is
made. The Department shall, on or before March 1 of each year,
publish the adjusted amount for the next fiscal year on its Internet
website or otherwise make that information available to short-term
lessors.
(b) If the vehicle has a manufacturer’s suggested retail price of
more than $60,000, not more than $150 per full or partial rental day
or 24-hour rental period, as appropriate, for the waiver. The
monetary amounts set forth in this paragraph must be adjusted for
each fiscal year that begins on or after July 1, 2021, by adding to
each amount the product of that amount multiplied by the
percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index West Urban for
All Urban Consumers (All Items) between the calendar year ending
on December 31, 2017, and the calendar year immediately
preceding the fiscal year for which the adjustment is made. The
Department shall, on or before March 1 of each year, publish the
adjusted amounts for the next fiscal year on its Internet website or
otherwise make that information available to short-term lessors.
4. A short-term lessor who disseminates an advertisement in
the State of Nevada that contains a rate for the lease of a passenger
car shall include in the advertisement a clearly readable statement of
the charge for a waiver of damages and a statement that the waiver
is optional.
5. A short-term lessor shall not engage in any unfair, deceptive
or coercive conduct to induce a short-term lessee to purchase a
waiver of damages, optional insurance or any other optional good or
service, including, but not limited to, refusing to honor the lessee’s
reservation, limiting the availability of cars, requiring a deposit or
debiting or blocking the lessee’s credit card account for a sum
equivalent to a deposit if the lessee declines to purchase a waiver,
optional insurance or any other optional good or service.
6. For the purposes of subsection 5, the sale of a policy of
insurance by a short-term lessor in accordance with the provisions
of subsection 2 does not constitute engaging in any unfair, deceptive
or coercive conduct in violation of subsection 5.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 218D.430 and
218D.435, a committee may vote on this act before the expiration of
the period prescribed for the return of a fiscal note in NRS
218D.475. This section applies retroactively from and after
November 13, 2025.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
36th Special Session (2025)